Alabama, session 2026rs, HB252.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 17-5-6, Code of Alabama 1975, is
Page 1

Section 1. Section 17-5-6, Code of Alabama 1975, is
HB252 INTRODUCED
amended to read as follows:
"§17-5-6
(a) A political action committee and a principal
campaign committee shall maintain a checking account, money
market account, or other similar banking account and shall
deposit any all contributions received by such the committee
into such that account. No expenditure of funds may be made by
any such a political action committee or principal campaign
committee except by check drawn on such that account,
electronic transfer from such that account, a credit card the
balance of which is paid from such that account, or out of a
petty cash fund from which it the committee may make
expenditures not in excess of one hundred dollars ($100) to
any person in connection with a single purchase or
transaction.
(b) All contributions must be held in a federally
insured financial institution."
Section 2. This act shall become effective October 1,
2026.
Page 2